Utah statutes.
53-3-203.   Authorizing or permitting driving in violation of chapter -- Renting of motor vehicles -- License requirements -- Employees must be licensed  -- Violations.

(1)  A person may not authorize or knowingly permit a motor vehicle owned by him or under his control to be driven by a person in violation of this chapter.

(2) (a)  A person may not rent a motor vehicle to another person unless the person who will be the driver is licensed in this state, or in the case of a nonresident, licensed under the laws of the state or country of his residence.

(b)  A person may not rent a motor vehicle to another person until he has inspected the license certificate of the person who will be the driver and verified the signature on the license certificate by comparison with the signature of the person who will be the driver written in his presence.

(c)  A person renting a motor vehicle to another shall keep a record of the:

(i)  registration number of the rented motor vehicle;

(ii)  name and address of the person to whom the motor vehicle is rented;

(iii)  number of the license certificate of the renter; and

(iv)  date and place the license certificate was issued.

(d)  The record is open to inspection by any peace officer or officer or employee of the division.

(3)  A person may not employ a person to drive a motor vehicle who is not licensed as required under this chapter.

(4)  A person who violates Subsection (1), (2)(a), or (3) is guilty of a class C misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 51, 1997 General Session

